Florida, session 2026, SB394.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (g) of subsection (2) of 15 section 626.7492, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 626.7492âReinsurance intermediaries.â 17 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section: 18 (b)ââControlling personâ means having the direct or 19 indirect power, as a any person, firm, association, or 20 corporation, who directly or indirectly has the power to direct 21 or cause to be directed, the management, control, or activities 22 of the reinsurance intermediary. 23 (g)ââReinsurance intermediary managerâ means any person who 24 has authority to bind, or manages all or part of, the assumed 25 reinsurance business of a reinsurer, including the management of 26 a separate division, department, or underwriting office, and 27 acts as a representative for the reinsurer whether known as a 28 reinsurance intermediary manager, manager, or other similar 29 term. Notwithstanding the above, none of the following persons 30 is a reinsurance intermediary manager with respect to the 31 reinsurer for the purposes of this section: 32 1.âAn employee of the reinsurer.; 33 2.âA manager of the United States branch of an alien 34 reinsurer.; 35 3.âAn underwriting manager who which, pursuant to contract, 36 manages all the reinsurance operations of the reinsurer, is 37 under common control with the reinsurer, subject to the holding 38 company act, and whose compensation is not based on the volume 39 of premiums written. 40 4.âThe manager of a group, association, pool, or 41 organization of insurers which engages engage in joint 42 underwriting or joint reinsurance and who are subject to 43 examination by the insurance regulatory authority of the state 44 in which the managerâs principal business office is located. 45 5.âAn underwriting manager who manages assumed facultative 46 risks for a reinsurer, if the facultative reinsurance business 47 managed by the underwriting manager is less than 10 percent of 48 the assumed annual gross written premium of the reinsurer. 49 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 50 made by this act to section 626.7492, Florida Statutes, in a 51 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 52 626.022, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 53 626.022âScope of part.â 54 (1)âThis part applies as to insurance agents, service 55 representatives, adjusters, and insurance agencies; as to any 56 and all kinds of insurance; and as to stock insurers, mutual 57 insurers, reciprocal insurers, and all other types of insurers, 58 except that: 59 (a)âIt does not apply as to reinsurance, except that ss. 60 626.011-626.022, ss. 626.112-626.181, ss. 626.191-626.211, ss. 61 626.291-626.301, s. 626.331, ss. 626.342-626.511, ss. 626.541 62 626.591, and ss. 626.601-626.711 shall apply as to reinsurance 63 intermediaries as defined in s. 626.7492. 64 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.